Washington statutes.
RCW 41.12.110

Power to create offices, make appointments and fix salaries not infringed.

All offices, places, positions and employments coming within the purview of this chapter, shall be created by the person or group of persons who, acting singly or in conjunction, as a mayor, city manager, chief, common council, commission or otherwise, it is vested by law with power and authority to select, appoint, or employ any person coming within the purview of this chapter, and nothing herein contained shall infringe upon the power and authority of any such person or group of persons, or appointing power, to fix the salaries and compensation of all employees employed hereunder.

[ 1937 c 13 s 12; RRS s 9558a-12.]